Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-410
Nebraska Library Commission; disbursements; power of director.

The director may from time to time as needed draw a voucher signed by himself in favor of any party to whom money is due, stating in such voucher what the money is to be used for. Upon presentation of such order the Director of Administrative Services shall draw his warrant upon the State Treasurer for the amount thereof, not exceeding the amount of the appropriation for the purposes of the Nebraska Library Commission.

Laws 1935, c. 115, § 10, p. 372;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 51-510;

R.S.1943, § 51-410;

Laws 1972, LB 1033, § 14.